Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-243
Town officers; oath; failure to take; effect.

If any person chosen or appointed to any town office shall neglect to take or subscribe such oath, and cause a certificate thereof to be filed as above required, such neglect shall be deemed to be a refusal to serve.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 41, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 1027;

C.S.1922, § 929;

C.S.1929, § 26-243;

R.S.1943, § 23-243.

Neglect of road overseer to comply with this section may be deemed refusal by him to serve in that capacity. State ex rel. Luckey v. Weber, 124 Neb. 84, 245 N.W. 407 (1932).